ext/fulltext/data/dicts/french/fulltext.dict
abstrais/jnmtlg
acagnardée/F
accélère/jnlu
aciérage/LMS
acquittée/LMF
admiratrice/LMG
adéquate/LMF
affranchis/jnmtluw
agglutinante/LMF
aggravation/LMS
alertée/F
allie/jnmtlu
allume-cigare/LMS
aloyau/LMX
ambleuse/LMG
ambulancière/LMF
anagogique/LMS
angevine/LMF
anime/jnmtlu
anticyclonique/LMS
antérieure/LMF
apparais/jmtng
apte/LMS
aqueuse/LMF
arbrisseau/LMX
ardoise/jnlu
arpenteuse/LMG
arsenal/LMX
articulé/LMS
artérielle/LMF
assieds/jnmtlg
assénée/F
atermoie/jnu
attestation/LMS
auberge/XLMS
auto-équilibrante/LMF
avouable/LMS
badaude/F
badine/u
bafouilleuse/G
bandeau/X
barbaresque/S
batardeau/X
bateleuse/G
bats/g
bave/u
bedeau/X
biberon/S
bijou/X
bilatérale/F
blaireau/X
blindage/S
blottis/uw
bordereau/X
boulotte/F
bourrelier/S
boursicoteuse/G
boursoufle/u
boutefeu/X
brushing/S
brusque/u
butineuse/G
bûcheronne/F
cadeau/X
caille/u
campeuse/G
caniveau/X
cantal/S
capésienne/F
caracole/u
carreau/X
cerceau/X
chahute/u
chamailleuse/G
chameau/X
chancelière/F
chancellerie/S
chaudeau/X
cheveu/X
chine/u
chronométreuse/G
château/X
circadienne/F
circoncis/gw
civilisation/S
classe/u
colineau/X
collectionneuse/G
colossale/F
combats/g
commissionne/u
comparais/g
comprends/g
conceptrice/G
conclaviste/S
conduis/g
confraternelle/F
confronte/u
construis/g
contemptrice/G
contre-mine/u
contredis/gw
convaincs/g
convulsive/F
copeau/X
corporal/X
cotise/u
coulissier/S
couvre-feu/X
covendeuse/G
crainte/F
croche/u
cuis/Rg
cuveau/X
dandine/u
dangereuse/F
dasyure/S
demandeuse/G
dieu/X
dis/Rgw
dissolvante/F
dissous/g
distillatrice/G
dièse/S
doleau/X
dors/g
douche/u
draineuse/G
décennale/F
décervelle/u
découpure/S
décris/g
déduis/g
défenderesse/G
définis/uw
démaille/u
dénonciatrice/G
dépolitise/u
désenraye/u
désignative/F
détentrice/XG
détruis/g
dévideuse/G
dévire/u
dévotion/S
embottelée/F
emprunteuse/LMG
emprésure/jnlu
encline/LMF
endors/jnmtlg
enfaîteau/LMX
enjugue/jnlu
ennéagonale/LMF
enrouleuse/LMG
entremets/jnmtlg
entrevois/jnmtlg
enveloppé/S
envoûtée/F
esquimau/LMX
essuie/jnmtlu
excavatrice/LMG
expansée/LMF
fais/DRg
faisceau/X
falerne/S
faneuse/G
feinte/u
finlandaise/F
flambeau/X
flambeuse/G
folio/S
fouisseuse/G
fragilise/u
fris/gw
fuseau/X
fécondatrice/G
gailletin/S
galiléenne/F
gerzeau/X
glane/u
glisseuse/G
gonozoïde/S
grimpeuse/G
grumeau/X
gémis/uw
génoise/F
habitacle/LMS
hameau/X
herscheuse/G
hybridation/LMS
hydrographique/XLMS
hypernerveuse/LMF
immunitaire/LMS
imperméabilise/jnmtlu
impuissante/LMF
incitatrice/LMG
indue/LMF
induis/jnmtlg
infusoire/LMS
insinuante/LMF
institutrice/LMG
instruis/jnmtlg
introduis/jnmtlg
intronise/jnmtlu
intégrale/LMF
isocèle/LMS
jambonneau/X
javeleuse/G
jumeau/X
kalmouke/F
lainerie/S
laveuse/G
ligne/u
lionceau/X
lobélie/S
lotisseuse/G
loyale/F
luis/Rg
majoral/X
mambo/S
manipulatrice/G
marine/u
massière/F
meneau/X
meneuse/G
mets/DRg
microprocesseur/S
monopolisatrice/G
mordille/u
motarde/F
motte/S
museau/X
méconnais/g
méfais/g
métrite/S
nais/Rg
nasilleuse/G
nombre/u
nominative/F
non-lieu/X
néocolonialiste/S
obturatrice/LMG
officinale/LMF
oiseau/LMX
omets/jnmtlg
orogénique/LMS
ovine/LMF
palangre/u
panonceau/X
paqueteuse/G
parais/g
paramécie/S
peltée/F
penseuse/G
permets/g
perquisitionne/u
peuplement/S
piailleuse/G
pieu/X
plaqueminier/S
pleureuse/G
plumeau/X
pointilleuse/F
ponctionne/u
porte-couteau/X
poulinière/S
pourvoyeur/G
prends/DRg
produis/Rg
promeus/g
pronostiqueuse/G
proudhonienne/F
pruneau/X
prédis/gw
présage/u
présentoir/S
prôneuse/G
pétrolière/F
quadrifide/S
rabats/g
rabouilleuse/G
ragote/u
rameau/X
rameuse/G
rassois/g
receveuse/g
rechampis/uw
reconduis/g
redingote/S
redéfais/g
relayeuse/G
remarie/u
rentrais/g
reproche/u
ressers/g
retardatrice/G
retranscris/g
rinceau/X
ronchonneuse/G
ronge/u
rotacée/F
rotarien/S
réadmets/g
réapprends/g
réduis/g
réformatrice/G
réimperméabilise/u
réintroduis/g
rénette/X
révélatrice/G
sadique/S
sais/g
saoule/F
saque/u
satineuse/G
semi-aride/S
senau/X
sers/g
shampouineuse/G
sou/S
souchette/u
soudière/F
soumets/g
sous-arbrisseau/X
soustrais/g
spectatrice/G
strophe/S
superstitieuse/F
supplante/u
surfais/g
sursois/g
sylvicultrice/G
synostose/S
sénéchal/X
tais/g
tapine/u
tequila/S
thermodynamicienne/F
tondeuse/G
touchau/X
toxicose/S
traficote/u
transcris/g
transparais/g
troupeau/X
trouveuse/G
tuberculine/S
tuniquée/F
tympanal/X
télescope/u
valable/S
vau/X
vertueuse/F
violeuse/G
voeu/X
volette/u
volontaire/S
ébranlée/F
écocide/LMS
édente/jnmtlu
éfourceau/LMX
égyptienne/LMF
électromotrice/LMG
élis/Rjnmtlg
épincetée/F
équipée/LMS
éradique/jnmtlu
éveillée/F
